Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB116.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1507. Credit for Employment at Congregate Care Facility.--(a) Subject to the requirements of 22 Pa. Code § 339.29 (relating to cooperative vocational education), a student who is in grade eleven or twelve at a school entity or nonpublic school , who is at least 16 years of age and who is employed, either on a paid or voluntary basis, at a congregate care facility may earn one elective credit toward graduation for each 12345678910111213141516171819 two hundred fifty (250) hours worked at the congregate care facility, for a maximum of two elective credits toward graduation.(b) The school entity or nonpublic school shall develop or modify an existing application process and form for the student should the student seek elective credit under this section with the following requirements:(1) The application form shall require the following information:(i) The name of the student.(ii) The name, address and telephone number of the congregate care facility at which the student is employed.(iii) The name of the individuals supervising the student at the congregate care facility.(iv) The nature of the student's employment at the congregate care facility.(v) The number of hours that the student is employed at the congregate care facility.(2) The school entity or nonpublic school shall establish deadlines for submission of the application and any conditions that the student must meet to obtain elective credit toward graduation, including verification of the number of hours worked at the congregate care facility.(3) The school entity or nonpublic school may not award the elective credit to the student unless the school entity or nonpublic school has approved the student's application and the student has satisfied all the requirements under this section. (4) The school entity or nonpublic school shall ensure that the student's employment at the congregate care facility satisfies the requirements of 22 Pa. Code § 339.29.20250SB0116PN1420 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Congregate care facility" shall mean any of the following:(1) A long-term care nursing facility as defined in section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the "Health Care Facilities Act."(2) A personal care home or an assisted living residence, licensed by the Department of Human Services under the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the "Human Services Code."(3) A MANAGED CARE PROGRAM THAT PROVIDES ALL-INCLUSIVE CARE FOR ELDERLY INDIVIDUALS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH AS ESTABLISHED IN ACCORDANCE WITH 42 CFR PT. 460 (RELATING TO PROGRAMS OF ALL-INCLUSIVE CARE FOR THE ELDERLY (PACE)).(4) A FACILITY WITH A CERTIFICATE OF AUTHORITY GRANTED BY THE INSURANCE DEPARTMENT UNDER THE ACT OF JUNE 18, 1984 (P.L.391, NO.82), KNOWN AS THE "CONTINUING-CARE PROVIDER REGISTRATION AND DISCLOSURE ACT.""Nonpublic school" shall mean a nonprofit school, other than a public school located within this Commonwealth, in which a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of this act and that meets the applicable requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 42 U.S.C. § 2000d et seq.)."School entity" shall mean a school district, charter school or cyber charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school operating within this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0116PN1420 - 3 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829